Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-225
False statement or book entry; destruction or secretion of records; penalty.

Any person who swears to any of the statements required by the Nebraska Trust Company Act, knowing them to be false, who subscribes to, makes, or causes to be made any false statement or false entry in the books of any trust company transacting a business under the act, who subscribes to or exhibits false papers or fails to make true and correct entry in the books and records of the trust company of its business and transactions in the manner and form prescribed by the Department of Banking and Finance, who mutilates, alters, destroys, secretes, or removes any of the books or records of the trust company without the written consent of the Director of Banking and Finance, or who makes, states, or publishes any false statement of the amount of the assets or liabilities of the trust company shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1911, c. 31, § 13, p. 195;

R.S.1913, § 751;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVIII, § 19, p. 723;

C.S.1922, § 8081;

C.S.1929, § 8-220;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 84, p. 179;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-220;

R.S.1943, § 8-225;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 54;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 41;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 49.